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DTC C 1741 / 41 AHCMotorRelayCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This relay is to supply power source to the pump & motor. The relay is stays ON while the height control is
operated.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1741 / 41

After the condition that the upper reaches voltage of the motor
relaysolenoid is2Vor lesswhenmotor relay isONcontinued
for40 ± 10msec.andwhen turningon theelectricity 1 sec.
lateranddetecting theshort circuit condition2 timescontinu-
ously.

SAHCmotor relay
SAHCmotor relaycircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the AHC motor relay circuit, the height control is prohibited after adjusting the vehicle to
the standard height in case that the height is higher than the standard or to the lowest wheel of the 4 wheels
in case that the height is lower than the standard.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckAHCmotor relayoperation.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Start theengineandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theACTIVETESTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check theoperationsoundof theAHCmotor relaywhenoperating itwith thehand −held tester.
OK:

The operation sound of the AHC motor relay should be heard.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Using SST, connect terminals Ts and CG of DLC3.

SST09843 −18040
(b) Push the ”DOWN” button of the height select switch 5

times or more within 5 seconds after starting the engine.
HINT:
At this time the height control OFF indicator light flashes at 0.25
second intervals.
CHECK:
(a) Change the damping mode select switch to the ”SPORT

2” position.
(b) Push the ”UP” button of the height select switch, then

check the operation sound of the AHC motor relay.
OK:

The operation sound of the AHC motor relay should
be heard.

OKGotostep4.

NG
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2Checkvoltagebetweenterminal 1 ofEngineRoomJ/B(forAHCmotor relay)and
body ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove the AHC motor relay from Engine Room J/B.
CHECK:
Measurevoltagebetween terminal 1 ofEngineRoomJ/B(for
AHC motor relay) and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NGCheckandrepairharnessorconnector.

OK

3 Check AHC motor relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the AHC motor relay from Engine Room J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each pair of terminal of motor relay.
OK:

Terminals 3 and 4
Continuity

(Referencevalue62 �)

Terminals 1 and2 Open

CHECK:
(a) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.
(b)Checkcontinuitybetween terminals 1 and2.
OK:

Terminals 1 and2 Continuity

NG Replace AHC motor relay.

OK
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4 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between AHC motor
relay and pump & motor, suspension control ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).


